Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-782
Petition; filed with clerk; response.

The petition described in section 31-781 shall be filed with the city or village clerk and shall be deemed received by the city council of the city or board of trustees of the village on the date upon which it is presented to the clerk. Following the filing of the petition, the district shall respond promptly and fully to all requests by the city or village for information with regard to any matter relevant to annexation.

Laws 1993, LB 210, § 2.